Utah, session 2026, HB523.
Section 1. Section 35A-16-202 is amended to read:35A-16-202Effective 05/06/26. Powers and duties of the office.(1)The office shall, under the direction of the coordinator:(a)assist in providing homeless services in the state;(b)coordinate the provision of homeless services in the state; (c)manage, with the concurrence of continuum of care organizations approved by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development, a Homeless Management Information System for the state that:(i)shares client-level data between service providers in the state;(ii)is effective as a case management system;(iii)except for individuals receiving services who are victims of domestic violence, includes an effective authorization protocol for encouraging individuals who are provided with any homeless services in the state to provide accurate information to providers for inclusion in the HMIS; and(iv)meets the requirements of the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development and other federal requirements; (d)in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, make rules defining "successful exit," "unsuccessful exit," and "neutral exit"; and (e)provide support to the steering committee in developing the formula described in Section 35A-16-211.(2)The office may:(a)by following the procedures and requirements of Title 63J, Chapter 5, Federal Funds Procedures Act, seek federal grants, loans, or participation in federal programs; and(b)except as provided in Subsection (3), for any federal program that requires the expenditure of state funds as a condition for participation by the state in a fund, property, or service, with the governor's approval, expend whatever funds are necessary out of the moneyfunds provided by the Legislature for the use of the office.(3)(a)As used in this Subsection (3):(i)"Large-scale, low-barrier shelter" means a year-round homeless shelter that provides 300 or more beds for overnight shelter.(ii)"Large-scale, low-barrier shelter" does not include a temporary emergency shelter.(b)The office may not expend any existing or future funds appropriated by the Legislature for any purpose relating to the establishment of a large-scale, low-barrier shelter.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 63I-2-263 is amended to read:63I-2-263Effective 05/06/26. Repeal dates: Titles 63A through 63O.(1)Title 63A, Chapter 2, Part 5, Educational Interpretation and Translation Services Procurement Advisory Council is repealed July 1, 2025.(2)Section 63A-5b-807, Eminent domain of unincorporated city owned land, is repealed January 1, 2027.(3)(2)Section 63A-17-806, Definitions -- Infant at Work Pilot Program -- Administration -- Report, is repealed June 30, 2026.(4)(3)Section 63C-1-103, Appointment and terms of boards, committees, councils, and commissions transitioning on October 1, 2024, or December 31, 2024, is repealed July 1, 2025.(5)(4)Section 63C-1-104, Appointment and terms of boards transitioning on October 1, 2024, is repealed January 1, 2025.(6)(5)Subsection 63G-6a-802(1)(e), regarding a procurement for a presidential debate, is repealed January 1, 2025.(7)(6)Subsection 63G-6a-802(3)(b)(iii), regarding a procurement for a presidential debate, is repealed January 1, 2025.(8)(7)Subsection 63H-7a-403(2)(b), regarding the charge to maintain the public safety communications network, is repealed July 1, 2033.(9)(8)Subsection 63J-1-602.2(30), regarding funding the Enterprise Zone Act, is repealed December 31, 2026.(10)(9)Subsection 63J-1-602.2(46), regarding appropriations to the State Tax Commission for deferral reimbursements, is repealed July 1, 2027.(11)(10)Section 63M-7-221, Expungement working group, is repealed April 30, 2025.(12)(11)Title 63N, Chapter 2, Part 2, Enterprise Zone Act, is repealed December 31, 2026.

Section 3:
Section 4.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.